Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 20

State Exclusive Regulator of Auxiliary Food and Drink Containers

7-51-2001. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Auxiliary container” means a bag, cup, bottle, can, device, eating or drinking utensil or tool, or other packaging, whether reusable or single use, which is:

Made of cloth, paper, plastic, including foamed or expanded plastic, cardboard, corrugated material, aluminum, glass, post-consumer recycled material, or similar material or substrates, including coated, laminated, or multilayer substrates; and

Designed for transporting, consuming, or protecting merchandise, food, or a beverage to or from, or at, a food service, manufacturing, distribution or processing facility, or retail facility; and

“Local government” means a county, municipality, or county with a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 2019, ch. 158, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 158, § 5. April 12, 2019.

7-51-2002. Prohibited regulation of auxiliary containers.

A local government shall not adopt or enforce a resolution, ordinance, policy, or regulation that:

Regulates the use, disposition, or sale of an auxiliary container;

Prohibits or restricts an auxiliary container; or

Enacts a fee, charge, or tax on an auxiliary container.

Subsection (a) must not be construed to restrict:

A curbside recycling program;

A designated residential or commercial recycling location;

A commercial recycling program;

The use of an auxiliary container on property owned by a local government; or

The regulation of auxiliary containers at an event, concert, or sports venue owned by a private or public entity or at an event managed by a local government.

Acts 2019, ch. 158, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 158, § 5. April 12, 2019.